Maryland, session 2025, HB0912.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
11–409.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “INSTRUCTOR” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED BY
OR UNDER CONTRACT WITH AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION:
(1) AS A TENURED OR NONTENURED PROFESSOR, AN INSTRUCTOR,
OR A TEACHING ASSISTANT; OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0912*

HOUSE BILL 912
(2) TO PROVIDE DIRECT INSTRUCTION TO STUDENTS.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION THAT HAS AN EXISTING TRAINING ON THE LEGAL OBLIGATIONS OF THE
INSTITUTION TOWARD STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES UNDER THE FEDERAL
AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT AND SECTION 504 OF THE REHABILITATION
ACT THAT MEETS THE STANDARDS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION.
(C) (1) BEGINNING IN THE 2026–2027 ACADEMIC YEAR, EACH
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL PROVIDE TO INSTRUCTORS OF THE
INSTITUTION TRAINING ON THE LEGAL OBLIGATIONS OF THE INSTITUTION TOWARD
STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES UNDER THE FEDERAL AMERICANS WITH
DISABILITIES ACT AND SECTION 504 OF THE REHABILITATION ACT, INCLUDING
INFORMATION ON ACADEMIC ACCOMMODATIONS AND ADJUSTMENTS FOR
QUALIFIED STUDENTS.
(2) THE TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE:
(I) PROVIDED TO INSTRUCTORS BY THE INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION IN PERSON OR VIRTUALLY; AND
(II) PROVIDED TO AND COMPLETED BY:
1. A NEW INSTRUCTOR BEFORE THE INSTRUCTOR
BEGINS TEACHING STUDENTS; AND
2. A CURRENTLY EMPLOYED INSTRUCTOR ON OR
BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL DEVELOP A MODEL TRAINING PROGRAM FOR
THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION THAT MAY
BE USED BY INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION THROUGHOUT THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.